District of Columbia statutes.
50-2606

Records and data available; additional surveys.

The National Capital Planning Commission and the Highway Planning Survey Unit shall make available such records and factual data and make such additional surveys as the Mayor may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 93, ch. 76, § 6
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-108, § 3(a), 27 DCR 3781
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(d), 53 DCR 6499
1981 Ed., § 40-808.
1973 Ed., § 40-807.
D.C. Law 16-175 deleted “or the Agency” following “Mayor”.
Motor Vehicle Parking Agency abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2604.